Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201419-5217
Sale of property
for nonpayment of taxes; land bank; power to bid; purchase of tax sale certificate;
apply for tax deed or foreclose lien.

(1)(a) At
any sale of real property for the nonpayment of taxes conducted pursuant to
sections 77-1801 to 77-1863, a land bank may:

(i) Bid on such real property in an amount equal to the total
amount of taxes, interest, and costs due on the real property. If a bid is
given pursuant to this subdivision, the bid shall not receive any special
treatment by the county treasurer and shall be accepted or rejected in the
same manner as any other bid on such real property; or

(ii) Give an automatically accepted bid on such real property
in an amount equal to the total amount of taxes, interest, and costs due on
the real property. If an automatically accepted bid is given, it shall be
accepted by the county treasurer regardless of any other bids on such real
property. An automatically accepted bid may be given only if the conditions
for making such a bid prescribed by the board pursuant to subsection (11)
of section 19-5205 have been met.

(b) If a land bank's bid pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of
this section is accepted by the county treasurer, the land bank shall pay
the county treasurer and shall be entitled to a tax sale certificate for such
real property.

(2) If a county holds a tax sale certificate pursuant to section
77-1809, a land bank may purchase such tax sale certificate from the county
by paying the county treasurer the amount expressed on the face of the certificate
and interest thereon at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate
may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature, from the date the tax
sale certificate was first issued to the county to the date such certificate
was purchased by the land bank.

(3)(a) Subdivision
(b) of this subsection applies until January 1, 2015. Subdivision (c) of this
subsection applies beginning January 1, 2015.

(b) Within six months after
the expiration of three years from the date of sale of real property for the
nonpayment of taxes pursuant to sections 77-1801 to 77-1863, a land bank that
has acquired a tax sale certificate for such real property under this section
may:

(i) Apply to the county treasurer
for a tax deed for the real property described in the tax sale certificate.
A land bank applying for a tax deed shall comply with all the requirements
of sections 77-1801 to 77-1863 relating to such tax deed; or

(ii) Foreclose the lien represented
by the tax sale certificate as authorized in section 77-1902.

(c) Within
nine months after the expiration of three years from the date of sale of real
property for the nonpayment of taxes pursuant to sections 77-1801 to 77-1863,
a land bank that has acquired a tax sale certificate for such real property
under this section may:

(i) Apply to the county treasurer for a tax deed for the real property
described in the tax sale certificate. A land bank applying for a tax deed
shall comply with all the requirements of sections 77-1801 to 77-1863 relating
to such tax deed; or

(ii) Foreclose the lien represented by the tax sale certificate
as authorized in section 77-1902.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 17;

Laws 2014, LB851, § 1.
July 18, 2014